Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.143

Court-ordered treatment—Required disclosures.

When an offender receiving court-ordered mental health or chemical dependency treatment or treatment ordered by the department of corrections presents for treatment from a mental health or chemical dependency treatment provider, the offender must disclose to the mental health or chemical dependency treatment provider whether he or she is subject to supervision by the department of corrections. If an offender has received relief from disclosure pursuant to RCW 9.94A.562 or 71.05.132, the offender must provide the mental health or chemical dependency treatment provider with a copy of the order granting the relief.

[ 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 404; 2004 c 166 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2016 sp.s. c 29: See note following RCW 71.05.760.

Short title—Right of action—2016 sp.s. c 29: See notes following RCW 71.05.010.

Severability—Effective dates—2004 c 166: See notes following RCW 71.05.040.